Massachusetts, session 194th, S889.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of Chapter 12C of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition
is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Self-insured group” the following
definitions:-
“Single payer benchmark”, the estimated total costs of providing health care to all
residents of Massachusetts under a single payer health care system in the previous year, as
established in section 23.
“Single payer health care”, a system providing publicly financed, universal access to
health care for the population through a unified public health care plan, simplifying
administration and allowing the budgeting of health care spending.
Chapter 12C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 24 the
following:-
of 2

Section 25. (a) The center shall monitor, review, and evaluate reports related to single
payer health care; provided, that the center shall also monitor the performance of single payer
health care systems in other states and countries. (b) The center shall establish a single payer
benchmark that shall be an estimate of the total cost of providing health care to all residents of
Massachusetts under a single payer health care system during the previous year, provided that
the single payer health care system offers continuous, comprehensive, affordable coverage for all
Massachusetts residents regardless of income, assets, health status, or availability of other health
coverage. (c) The center shall include in its annual report, as mandated by section 16 (a), a
comparison of the single payer benchmark with the actual health care spending in the state for
the previous year, indicating whether the state would have saved money while expanding access
to care under a single payer health care system.
Chapter 6D of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 21 the
following:-
Section 22. If at the outset of fiscal year 2026, the board determines that the single payer
benchmark, as calculated by the Center for Health Information and Analysis under Section 25 of
Chapter 12C, has outperformed the actual total health care spending and spending growth in the
state, the commission shall, no later than June 30, 2027, submit a “Single Payer Health Care
Implementation Plan” to the Legislature for consideration. The Implementation Plan will be
developed after holding public hearings and meetings across the state, and will consist of
legislation to implement a single payer health care system for Massachusetts, as defined in
Section 1 of Chapter 12C, and that offers continuous, comprehensive, affordable coverage for all
Massachusetts residents regardless of income, assets, health status, or availability of other health
coverage.
of 2